District of Columbia statutes.
50-901

Establishment of the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(a)

Pursuant to § 1-204.04(b), there is hereby established in the Executive Branch of the government of the District of Columbia a Department of Motor Vehicles (“DMV”).

(b)

The Director of the DMV shall have authority over the department and all functions and personnel assigned thereto, including the power to re-delegate to other employees and officials of the department such powers and authority as, in the judgment of the Director is warranted in the interests of efficiency and sound administration.

History

Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1822, 45 DCR 7193

Section References

This section is referenced in § 31-2402 and § 50-2301.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-151.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of §§ 50-901 to 50-906, see §§ 1422-1427 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), §§ 1422-1427 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669), and §§ 1422-1427 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90-day) addition of Chapter 1A, see §§ 1421 to 1427 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90 day) provisions for budget submission by the Division of Transportation, see § 1603 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) reclassification of positions at the Department of Motor Vehicles, see § 642 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2002, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) reclassification of positions at the Department of Motor Vehicles, see § 642 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).

Short Title

Short title of subtitle E of title VI of Law 15-39: Section 641 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that subtitle E of title VI of the act may be cited as the Position Reclassification of Department of Motor Vehicles Staff Amendment Act of 2003.

Editor's Notes

Section 642 of D.C. Law. 15-39 provided: “The Mayor and Director of the Office of Personnel shall complete classification and compensation studies of the positions of motor vehicle inspectors and front-line counter employees at the Department of Motor Vehicles by November 1, 2003.”

Section 1830 of D.C. Law 12-175 provided that this chapter shall apply as of October 1, 1998.

Department of Motor Vehicles Establishment Act of 1988: Section 1821 of D.C. Law 12-175 provided that this chapter may be cited as the “Department of Motor Vehicles Establishment Act of 1998.”

Section 1703 of D.C. Law 14-28, as amended by Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 91, 51 DCR 881, provided:

“Budget submission—Division of Transportation of the Department of Public Works.

“(a) In the budget which the Mayor is required to submit to the Council each year, the Mayor shall provide sufficient revenues or funds for the operation and administration of the Division of Transportation of the Department of Public Works. The budgeted revenues or funds shall not include any funds which have been or will be deposited in the Local Roads Construction and Maintenance Fund pursuant to section 102 of the Highway Trust Fund Establishment Act of 1996, effective April 9, 1997 (D.C. Law 11-184; D.C. Official Code 9-111.01).

“(b) In FY 2002, $28,580,000 in local appropriations shall be used for the operation and administration expenses of the Division of Transportation of the Department of Public Works.

“(c) In FY 2002, not more than $18 million may be taken from the rights-of way fees to be used for operation and administration expenses for the Division of Transportation of the Department of Public Works with all remaining rights-of-way fees dedicated to the fund established by section 102a of Highway Trust Fund Establishment Act of 1996, passed on second reading on June 5, 2001 (Enrolled version of Bill 14-144) [D.C. Official Code § 9-111.01a.]